Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2707.01
Nonparticipating manufacturers; bond or cash equivalent; amount; provide evidence to Attorney General and Tax Commissioner; failure to make escrow deposits; execution upon bond.

(1) All nonparticipating manufacturers subject to the certification requirements of section 69-2706, or whose sales are authorized pursuant to an agreement under section 77-2602.06, shall post a bond, or its cash equivalent, for the benefit of the state, which is subject to execution under subsection (5) of this section. The bond shall be posted by corporate surety located within the United States. The cash equivalent of the bond shall be posted by the nonparticipating manufacturer in an account approved by the Attorney General.

(2) The amount of the bond, or its cash equivalent, shall be the greater of:

(a) One hundred thousand dollars;

(b) The greatest required escrow amount due from the nonparticipating manufacturer, or its predecessors, successors, affiliates, importers, or stamping agents, as such terms may be defined and liabilities may be established within sections 69-2701 to 69-2711, for any of the preceding twenty calendar quarters; or

(c) The greatest required annual total of quarterly escrow amounts due from the nonparticipating manufacturer, or its predecessors, successors, affiliates, importers, or stamping agents, as such terms may be defined and liabilities may be established within sections 69-2701 to 69-2711, for any of the preceding five calendar years, if the Attorney General deems the nonparticipating manufacturer to pose an elevated risk for noncompliance.

(3) The Attorney General may deem a nonparticipating manufacturer to pose an elevated risk for noncompliance if:

(a) The nonparticipating manufacturer or its brands or brand families, or any predecessor, successor, affiliate, or importer or any of their brands or brand families, has failed to deposit fully the amount due on an escrow obligation with respect to any state at any time during the calendar year or within the preceding five calendar years unless either:

(i) The nonparticipating manufacturer did not underdeposit knowingly or recklessly and promptly cured the underdeposit within one hundred eighty days of notice of the underdeposit; or

(ii) The underdeposit or lack of deposit is the subject of a good faith dispute in the form of ongoing litigation that has not reached a final order as reasonably documented to the Attorney General and the underdeposit is cured within one hundred eighty days of entry of a final order establishing the amount of the required escrow deposit;

(b) Any state has removed the nonparticipating manufacturer or its brands or brand families, or any predecessor, successor, affiliate, or importer or any of their brands or brand families, from the state's tobacco directory for noncompliance with the state's escrow deposit or tobacco tax laws at any time during the calendar year or within the preceding five calendar years, unless such removal is subject to a good faith dispute in the form of an ongoing challenge under administrative procedure or litigation that has not reached a final order as reasonably documented to the Attorney General;

(c) Any state has an unsatisfied final judgment against the nonparticipating manufacturer or its brands or brand families, or any predecessor, successor, affiliate, or importer or any of their brands or brand families, for escrow or for penalties, fees, costs, refunds, or attorney's fees related to noncompliance with state escrow laws;

(d) The nonparticipating manufacturer, or any predecessor, successor, or affiliate, sells its cigarettes or tobacco products directly to consumers via remote or other non-face-to-face means;

(e) A state or federal court determines that the nonparticipating manufacturer, or any predecessor, successor, or affiliate, has violated any tobacco tax or tobacco control law or engaged in unfair business practices or unfair competition;

(f) Any state has suspended or revoked a license granted to the nonparticipating manufacturer, or any predecessor, successor, or affiliate, to engage in any aspect of tobacco business, unless the suspension or revocation is subject to a good faith dispute in the form of an ongoing challenge under administrative procedure or litigation that has not reached a final order as reasonably documented to the Attorney General;

(g) Any state or federal court has determined that the nonparticipating manufacturer, or any predecessor, successor, or affiliate, failed to comply with state or federal law imposing marking, labeling, and stamping requirements or requiring information to be affixed to, or contained in, the labels, markings, or packaging; or

(h) The nonparticipating manufacturer fails to submit or complete any required forms, documents, certification, or notices, in a timely manner or to the satisfaction of the Attorney General or Tax Commissioner, unless such failure is subject to a good faith dispute in the form of an ongoing challenge under administrative procedure or litigation that has not reached a final order as reasonably documented to the Attorney General.

(4) A nonparticipating manufacturer shall post the bond or its cash equivalent and shall provide evidence of such posting to the Attorney General and Tax Commissioner both annually, as required by section 69-2706, and at least ten days in advance of each calendar quarter as a condition to the nonparticipating manufacturer and its brands or brand families being included in the directory.

(5) If a nonparticipating manufacturer that posted a bond pursuant to this section has failed to make, or have made on its behalf by an entity with joint and several liability, escrow deposits equal to the full amount owed for a quarter within fifteen days following the due date for the quarter under section 69-2703, the state may execute upon the bond, first to recover delinquent escrow, which amount shall be deposited into a qualified escrow account under section 69-2703, and then to recover civil penalties and costs authorized under such section. Escrow obligations above the amount collected on the bond remain due from that nonparticipating manufacturer and, as provided in subdivision (2)(d) of section 69-2703 and section 69-2708.01, from the importers and stamping agents that sold its cigarettes during that calendar quarter.

Laws 2011, LB590, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 16.